Oklahoma, session 2026, SB879.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-511.1 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As provided in the Parents’ Bill of Rights, a health care


provider shall not administer any vaccine to an infant including,


but not limited to, the Hepatitis B vaccine, unless the health care


provider has obtained the prior written informed consent of the


infant’s parent or legal guardian and has explained any risks


associated with the vaccine to the parent or legal guardian.


B. The vaccines described in subsection A of this section shall


be voluntary and on an opt-in basis only. The health care provider


shall not require, or imply that it is required for, the parent or

Req. No. 880 Page 1


legal guardian to consent to such vaccines on behalf of the parent


or legal guardian’s infant.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-880 DC 1/19/2025 5:45:06 AM







































Req. No. 880 Page 2